Colorado statutes. TITLE 17 Corrections
ARTICLE 34
SPECIALIZED PROGRAM FOR JUVENILES
CONVICTED AS ADULTS

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 16-180, see section 1 of chapter 352, Session Laws of Colorado 2016.

Section

17-34-101. Juveniles and young adults who are convicted as adults in district court and young adults convicted under twenty-one years of age - eligibility for specialized program placement - petitions - definition.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an offender serving a sentence in the department for a felony offense as a result of the filing of criminal charges by an information or indictment pursuant to section 19-2.5-801, or the transfer of proceedings to the district court pursuant to section 19-2.5-802, or pursuant to either of these sections as they existed prior to their repeal and reenactment, with amendments, by House Bill 96-1005, or a young adult offender serving a sentence in the department for a felony offense that was committed when the offender was under twenty-one years of age and that sentence is not a sentence of life without the possibility of parole, and the offender in any of these cases remains in the custody of the department for that felony offense, may petition for placement in the specialized program described in section 17-34-102, referred to within this section as the "specialized program", as follows:

Except as provided in subsection (1)(a)(IV) of this section, if the felony of which the person was convicted was not murder in the first degree, as described in section 18-3-102, then the offender may petition for placement in the specialized program after serving twenty years of his or her sentence if he or she:

Has not been released on parole;

Has not been convicted of an offense of unlawful sexual behavior, as defined in section 16-22-102 (9), or an offense that the underlying factual basis is unlawful sexual behavior, as defined in section 16-22-102 (9), or an offense in which the underlying facts support the fact that the offender committed, participated in, or aided or abetted in the commission of a sexual offense even if the offender was not convicted of a sexual offense;

Is not or has not been previously placed in a treatment program within the department for a serious behavioral or mental health disorder;

Has obtained, at a minimum, a high school diploma or has successfully passed a high school equivalency examination, as defined in section 22-33-102 (8.5), C.R.S.;

Has participated in programs offered to him or her by the department and demonstrated responsibility and commitment in those programs;

Has demonstrated positive growth and change through increasing developmental maturity and quantifiable good behavior during the course of his or her incarceration; and

Has accepted responsibility for the criminal behavior underlying the offense for which he or she was convicted.

If the felony of which the person was convicted was murder in the first degree, as described in section 18-3-102 (1)(b), as it existed prior to September 15, 2021, or (1)(d), or murder in the second degree, as described in section 18-3-103 (1)(b), then the offender may petition for placement in the specialized program after serving twenty years of his or her sentence if he or she satisfies the criteria described in subsections (1)(a)(I)(A) to (1)(a)(I)(G) of this section.

If the felony of which the person was convicted was murder in the first degree, as described in section 18-3-102, but was not murder in the first degree, as described in section 18-3-102 (1)(b), as it existed prior to September 15, 2021, or (1)(d), or murder in the second degree, as described in section 18-3-103 (1)(b), then the offender may petition for placement in the specialized program after serving twenty-five years of his or her sentence if he or she satisfies the criteria described in subsections (1)(a)(I)(A) to (1)(a)(I)(G) of this section.

If the felony the person was charged with was murder in the first degree, as described in section 18-3-102, with the possible penalty of life without the possibility of parole, and the person was eighteen years of age or older but less than twenty-one years of age at the time of the commission of the offense, and the person entered a plea of guilty to a lesser felony offense and received a determinate sentence to the department with the possibility of parole, then the offender may only petition for placement in the specialized program after serving thirty calendar years of his or her sentence and the offender may only be released on early parole pursuant to the provisions of section 17-22.5.403.7 (2) after serving thirty-five calendar years. For purposes of this subsection (1)(a)(IV), "calendar year" means twelve consecutive months without any time credit deductions.

An offender who is described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) may apply for placement in the specialized program notwithstanding his or her sentence or parole eligibility date.

Upon receiving a petition from an offender described in subsection (1) of this section, the executive director or the executive director's designee shall review the petition and determine whether to place the offender in the specialized program. The executive director or the executive director's designee shall not place an offender in the program if the department classified the offender as a sex offender pursuant to department administrative regulation. In making this determination, the executive director or the executive director's designee shall consider the following criteria:

The nature of the offense and the circumstances surrounding the offense, including the extent of the offender's participation in the criminal conduct;

The age and maturity of the offender at the time of the offense;

The behavior of the offender in any institution for the duration of his or her sentence, including consideration of any violations of the inmate code of conduct and dates of the violations or, in the alternative, the lack of any such violations;

The assessed risk and needs of the offender;

The impact of the offense on any victim and any victim's immediate family member; and

Any other factor determined to be relevant by the executive director or his or her designee in assessing and making a determination regarding the offender's demonstrated rehabilitation.

The department may make restorative justice practices, as defined in section 18-1-901 (3)(o.5), C.R.S., available to any victim of any offender who petitions for placement in the specialized program, as may be appropriate, but only if requested by the victim and the victim has registered with the department of corrections requesting notice of victims' rights pursuant to the provisions of part 3 of article 4.1 of title 24, C.R.S.

If after review of an offender's petition, the executive director or his or her designee determines that the offender is an appropriate candidate for placement in the specialized program, the department shall place the offender in the specialized program as soon as practicable.

Any victim or victim's immediate family member, as defined in section 24-4.1-302 (5) and (6), C.R.S., has the right to be informed of the placement of an offender pursuant to sections 24-4.1-302.5 (1)(q) and 24-4.1-303 (14), C.R.S.

If the executive director or his or her designee denies an offender's petition for placement in the specialized program based on a determination that the offender is inappropriate for such placement after consideration of the criteria set forth in subsection (2) of this section, the offender may petition the executive director or his or her designee for placement in the specialized program not sooner than three years after the issuance of the denial.

The department shall develop policies and procedures for the preparation, submission, and review of petitions for placement of offenders in the specialized program, as described in this section.

Source:

L. 2016:

Entire article added, (SB 16-180), ch. 352, p. 1439, § 2, effective August 10.

L. 2017:

IP(1)(a), IP(1)(a)(I), and (1)(a)(I)(C) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1304, § 135, effective May 25.

L. 2021:

IP(1)(a), IP(1)(a)(I), (1)(a)(I)(B), (1)(a)(I)(C), and IP(2) amended and (1)(a)(IV) added, (HB 21-1209), ch. 448, p. 2949, § 2, effective September 7; (1)(a)(II) and (1)(a)(III) amended, (SB 21-124), ch. 58, p. 236, § 3, effective September 15; IP(1)(a) amended, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 717, § 38, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

Amendments to the introductory portion to subsection (1)(a) by HB 21-1209 and SB 21-059 were harmonized.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

17-34-102. Specialized program for juveniles and young adults convicted as adults and young adults convicted under twenty-one years of age - report - definition.

The department shall develop and implement a specialized program for offenders who have been sentenced to an adult prison for a felony offense committed while the offender was under eighteen years of age as a result of the filing of criminal charges by an information or indictment pursuant to section 19-2.5-801, or the transfer of proceedings to the district court pursuant to section 19-2.5-802, or pursuant to either of these sections as they existed prior to their repeal and reenactment, with amendments, by House Bill 96-1005, or offenders serving a sentence in the department for a felony offense that was committed when the offender was under twenty-one years of age, and the offenders in any of these cases are determined to be appropriate for placement in the specialized program. The department shall implement the specialized program within or in conjunction with a facility operated by, or under contract with, the department.

The specialized program must include components that allow an offender to experience placement with more independence in daily life, with additional work-related responsibilities and other program components that will assist and support the offender's successful reintegration into the community of offenders who have never lived independently or functioned in the community as an adult. The specialized program must also include best and promising practices in independent living skills development, reentry services for long-term offenders, and intensive supervision and monitoring.

The department shall not allow any participating offender to complete the specialized program in less than three years.

The department shall make restorative justice practices, as defined in section 18-1-901 (3)(o.5), available to any victim of any offender who petitions for placement in the specialized program, as may be appropriate, but only if requested by the victim and the victim has registered with the department of corrections requesting notice of victims' rights pursuant to the provisions of part 3 of article 4.1 of title 24.

Repealed.

The department shall include in the specialized program rules of conduct for program participants and a policy whereby program participants who fail to comply with the rules of conduct are terminated from participation in the specialized program and returned to an appropriate prison placement.

An offender who is terminated from the specialized program may not re-petition for placement in the specialized program sooner than three years from the date of such termination.

Notwithstanding any provision of law, an offender who successfully completes the specialized program is eligible to apply for early parole pursuant to the provisions of section 17-22.5-403 (4.5) or 17-22.5-403.7.

Except as described in subsections (8)(b) and (8)(c) of this section, if an offender has served at least twenty-five calendar years of his or her sentence and successfully completed the specialized program, unless rebutted by relevant evidence, it is presumed that:

The offender has met the factual burden of presenting extraordinary mitigating circumstances; and

The offender's release to early parole is compatible with the safety and welfare of society.

If an offender who committed murder in the first degree, as described in section 18-3-102 (1)(a), (1)(c), (1)(e), or (1)(f), has served thirty years of his or her sentence and successfully completed the program, unless rebutted by relevant evidence, the presumptions described in subsections (8)(a)(I) and (8)(a)(II) of this section apply.

If the felony the person was charged with was murder in the first degree, as described in section 18-3-102, with the possible penalty of life without the possibility of parole, and the person was eighteen years of age or older but less than twenty-one years of age at the time of the commission of the offense, and the person entered a plea of guilty to a lesser felony offense and received a determinate sentence to the department with the possibility of parole, and the offender has served thirty-five calendar years of his or her sentence and successfully completed the program, unless rebutted by relevant evidence, the presumptions described in subsections (8)(a)(I) and (8)(a)(II) of this section apply.

For purposes of this subsection (8), "calendar year" means twelve consecutive months without any time credit deductions.

On and after January 1, 2018, during its annual presentation before the joint judiciary committee of the general assembly, or any successor joint committee, pursuant to section 2-7-203, C.R.S., the department shall include a status report regarding the progress and outcomes of the specialized program developed and implemented by the department pursuant to this section during the preceding year. The report, at a minimum, shall include:

A description of the specialized program, including the evidence-based and promising practices that are included in the specialized program;

The policies and procedures developed by the department to determine which eligible offenders may be placed in the specialized program;

The policies and procedures developed by the department to address the conduct of participants in the specialized program;

The location of the program and the number of beds available for specialized program participants;

The number of offenders selected to participate in the specialized program; the number of offenders who were denied placement in the specialized program, including the reasons for such denials; and the number of offenders who were removed from the specialized program and the reasons for their removal;

A summary concerning the staffing of the specialized program;

Information concerning the behavior patterns of the offenders in the specialized program;

The number of offenders who successfully completed the specialized program;

The number of specialized program participants who have been referred to the parole board for early parole; and

The number of specialized program participants who were granted early parole by the governor.

Source:

L. 2016:

Entire article added, (SB 16-180), ch. 352, p. 1441, § 2, effective August 10.

L. 2021:

(1), (4), IP(8)(a), and (8)(b) amended and (8)(c) and (8)(d) added, (HB 21-1209), ch. 448, p. 2950, § 3, effective September 7; (1) amended, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 718, § 39, effective October 1.